ja: ウィンドウネット取り付けハードウェア: ボルトオン (タブ/ボルト); カラビナ/ループ; クリップオン (スプリングクリップ); 面ファスナー (ベルクロ); マグネット式; クイックリリースラッチ; ロッド＆スリーブ; ねじ込み式; ストラップバックル; その他
de: Befestigungsmaterial des Fensternetzes: Zum Anschrauben (Lasche/Schraube); Karabiner/Schlaufe; Zum Aufstecken (Federklemme); Klettverschluss (Velcro); Magnetisch; Schnellverschluss; Stange und Hülse; Zum Einschrauben; Gurtschnalle; Sonstige
lt-LT: Lango tinklo tvirtinimo įranga: Prisukama (auselė / varžtas); Karabinas / kilpa; Prisegama (spyruoklinis segtukas); Kibioji juosta („Velcro“); Magnetinė; Greitai atleidžiamas užraktas; Strypas ir mova; Įsukama; Dirželio sagtis; Kita
es: Hardware de montaje de la red para ventana: Atornillable (lengüeta/perno); Mosquetón/lazo; Con clip (clip de resorte); Cierre de gancho y bucle (Velcro); Magnético; Pestillo de liberación rápida; Varilla y funda; Enroscable; Hebilla de correa; Otro
zh-TW: 車窗網安裝五金配件: 螺栓固定 (鎖片/螺栓); 登山扣/扣環; 夾式 (彈簧夾); 魔鬼氈 (Velcro); 磁吸; 快拆鎖扣; 連桿和套筒; 螺絲固定; 綁帶扣環; 其他
sk-SK: Montážne kovanie na okenné sieťky: Na priskrutkovanie (príruba/skrutka); Karabína/slučka; Na pripnutie (pružinová spona); Suchý zips (Velcro); Magnetické; Rýchloupínacia západka; Tyč a puzdro; Na zaskrutkovanie; Popruhová spona; Iné
pt-PT: Hardware de montagem da rede de janela: Aparafusado (patilha/parafuso); Mosquetão/argola; De encaixe (mola de fixação); Gancho e laço (Velcro); Magnético; Trinco de libertação rápida; Varão e manga; De enroscar; Fivela de correia; Outro
cs: Montážní prvky okenní sítě: Šroubovací (očko/šroub); Karabina/smyčka; Nacvakávací (pružinová spona); Suchý zip (Velcro); Magnetické; Rychloupínací západka; Tyč a pouzdro; Šroubovací; Pásková spona; Jiné
nb: Monteringsutstyr for vindusnett: Påskrudd (lapp/bolt); Karabinkrok/løkke; Klips-på (fjærklips); Borrelås; Magnetisk; Hurtigutløserlås; Stang og mansjett; Skrus inn; Stroppespenne; Annet
it: Ferramenta per il montaggio di reti per finestrino: Imbullonata (linguetta/bullone); Moschettone/anello; A clip (clip a molla); A strappo (Velcro); Magnetica; Chiusura a sgancio rapido; Asta e manicotto; Avvitabile; Fibbia con cinturino; Altro
hr-HR: Okov za montažu prozorske mreže: Pričvršćivanje vijcima (pločica/vijak); Karabiner/omča; Kopča (opružna kopča); Čičak-traka (Velcro); Magnetski; Bravica za brzo otpuštanje; Šipka i navlaka; Na uvrtanje; Kopča za remen; Ostalo
ru: Крепеж оконной сетки: На болтах (ушко / болт); Карабин / петля; На зажимах (пружинный зажим); Липучка (Velcro); На магнитах; Быстроразъемная защелка; Стержень и втулка; Ввинчивающийся; Пряжка с ремешком; Другое
fi: Ikkunaverkon asennuslaitteisto: Pultattava (korvake/pultti); Karbiinihaka/lenkki; Klipsikiinnitys (jousiklipsi); Tarranauha (Velcro); Magneettinen; Pikalukitussalpa; Tanko ja holkki; Ruuvattava; Hihnasolki; Muu
sv: Monteringsutrustning för fönsternät: Fastbultad (flik/bult); Karbinhake/ögla; Fastklämd (fjäderklämma); Kardborreband (Velcro); Magnetisk; Snabblås; Stång och hylsa; Fastskruvad; Remspänne; Övrigt
tr: Pencere ağı montaj donanımı: Cıvatalı (tırnak/cıvata); Karabina/halka; Klipsli (yaylı klips); Cırt cırtlı (Velcro); Manyetik; Hızlı açılan mandal; Çubuk ve kılıf; Vidalı; Kayış tokası; Diğer
pl: Osprzęt montażowy siatki okiennej: Przykręcane (uchwyt/śruba); Karabińczyk/pętla; Zapinane (klips sprężynowy); Rzep (Velcro); Magnetyczne; Zatrzask szybkozamykający; Pręt i tuleja; Wkręcane; Klamra z paskiem; Inny
en: Window net mounting hardware: Bolt-on (tab/bolt); Carabiner/loop; Clip-on (spring clip); Hook-and-loop (Velcro); Magnetic; Quick-release latch; Rod and sleeve; Screw-in; Strap buckle; Other
da: Monteringsdele til vinduesnet: Bolt-on (tap/bolt); Karabinhage/løkke; Clip-on (fjederklemme); Burrebånd (velcro); Magnetisk; Quick-release-lås; Stang og hylster; Skrue; Remspænde; Andet
pt-BR: Rede de janela ferragens de montagem: Parafusado (aba/parafuso); Mosquetão/laço; Encaixe (clipe de mola); Fecho de contato (Velcro); Magnético; Fecho de liberação rápida; Haste e bainha; Rosqueado; Fivela de correia; Outro
hu: Ablakháló rögzítő hardver: Csavaros (rögzítőfül / csavar); Karabiner / Hurok; Csíptetős (rugós csat); Tépőzáras (Velcro); Mágneses; Gyorskioldós retesz; Rúd és hüvely; Becsavarható; Pántcsat; Egyéb
sl-SI: Okovje za montažo zaščitne mreže za okno: Za privitje (zavihek/vijak); Vponka/zanka; Zaponka (vzmetna zaponka); Ježek (Velcro); Magnetno; Zapah za hitro sprostitev; Palica in tulec; Na privijanje; Zaponka za trak; Drugo
nl: Raamnet bevestigingsmateriaal: Aanboutbaar (lip/bout); Karabijnhaak/lus; Clip-on (veerklem); Klittenband; Magnetisch; Snelsluiting; Stang en hoes; Inschroefbaar; Bandgesp; Overige
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ติดมุ้งลวดหน้าต่าง: ขันน็อต (แท็บ/สลักเกลียว); คาราบิเนอร์/ห่วง; แบบหนีบ (คลิปสปริง); ตีนตุ๊กแก (Velcro); แม่เหล็ก; สลักปลดเร็ว; แกนและปลอก; ขันสกรู; หัวเข็มขัดสายรัด; อื่นๆ
ko: 창문 방충망 장착 하드웨어: 볼트 온(탭/볼트); 카라비너/루프; 클립 온(스프링 클립); 후크 앤 루프(벨크로); 자석식; 퀵 릴리스 래치; 로드 및 슬리브; 스크루 인; 스트랩 버클; 기타
vi: Thiết bị gắn lưới cửa sổ: Gắn bằng bu lông (tab/bu lông); Móc carabiner/vòng; Kẹp (kẹp lò xo); Băng gai dính (Velcro); Nam châm; Chốt nhả nhanh; Thanh và ống bọc; Bắt vít; Khóa dây đeo; Khác
bg-BG: Крепежни елементи за монтаж на предпазна мрежа за прозорец: С болтове (планка/болт); Карабинер/халка; С клипс (пружинен клипс); Велкро; Магнитно; Резе за бързо освобождаване; Прът и ръкав; С винтове; Катарама за каишка; Друго
ro-RO: Elemente de montare pentru plasa de geam: Cu prindere prin înșurubare (ureche/șurub); Carabinieră/buclă; Cu prindere cu clemă (clemă cu arc); Sistem de prindere tip scai (Velcro); Magnetic; Închizătoare cu eliberare rapidă; Tijă și manșon; Prin înșurubare; Cataramă pentru curea; Altele
fr: Matériel de fixation du filet de fenêtre: À boulonner (patte/boulon); Mousqueton/boucle; À clipser (clip à ressort); Bande auto-agrippante (Velcro); Magnétique; Loquet à dégagement rapide; Tige et manchon; À visser; Boucle de sangle; Autre
el: Υλικό/εξαρτήματα στερέωσης σίτας παραθύρου: Βιδωτό (προεξοχή/βίδα); Καραμπίνερ/θηλιά; Κουμπωτό (ελατηριωτό κλιπ); Χριτς-χρατς (Velcro); Μαγνητικό; Μάνταλο ταχείας απασφάλισης; Ράβδος και περίβλημα; Βιδωτό; Αγκράφα ιμάντα; Άλλο
zh-CN: 车窗防护网安装五金件: 螺栓安装（接头/螺栓）; 登山扣/环; 夹紧（弹簧夹）; 魔术贴 (Velcro); 磁吸; 快速释放插销; 杆和套管; 旋入式; 绑带扣; 其他